Wyoming, session 2025, SF0035.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-39-118(a)(i) and (ii) and
1-42-202(e)(ii) are amended to read:

1-39-118. Maximum liability; insurance authorized.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, in any action under this act, the liability of the
SF0035

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0130
governmental entity, including a public employee while
acting within the scope of his duties, shall not exceed:

(i) The sum of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($250,000.00) five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000.00) to any claimant for any number of claims
arising out of a single transaction or occurrence; or

(ii) The sum of five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000.00) one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) for all
claims of all claimants arising out of a single transaction
or occurrence.

1-42-202. Local government self-insurance program;
creation; authorized payments.

(e) For any claim brought under the Wyoming
Governmental Claims Act the program shall be limited in
liability to payment of no more than the amounts specified
in paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection.
Participating local governments shall be responsible for
the amount of any adjudicated claims and expenses in excess
of:
SF0035

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0130

(ii) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00)
One million dollars ($1,000,000.00) for any other claim
brought under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act for any
one (1) occurrence plus loss adjustment expenses.

Section 2. This act applies to all claims under the
Wyoming Governmental Claims Act that are based upon a
transaction or occurrence that occurs on and after July 1,
2025. For purposes of this section, a "transaction" or
"occurrence" includes an act, error or omission.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0035